Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1297XS (5) 91 sc/ns S.F. 354 Section 1. AUTHORIZATION ââ BORDER NEGOTIATION WITH 1 MINNESOTA. 2 1. The governor shall appoint a resident of the state of 3 Iowa, and the majority leader of the senate and the speaker 4 of the house of representatives shall each appoint one member 5 from their respective chambers of the general assembly, which 6 three persons are hereby authorized to collectively negotiate 7 on behalf of the state of Iowa with the state of Minnesota 8 for the purchase of the following Minnesota counties: Rock, 9 Nobles, Jackson, Martin, Faribault, Freeborn, Mower, Fillmore, 10 and Houston. 11 2. Any negotiated agreement under this section must include 12 all of the following provisions: 13 a. The title of record in the state of Minnesota to any 14 lands, the jurisdiction of which is relinquished to the state 15 of Iowa, shall be accepted as the record title by the courts of 16 Iowa. 17 b. Any pending suits or actions concerning lands 18 relinquished to the state of Iowa may be prosecuted to final 19 judgment in the state of Minnesota and such judgments shall be 20 accorded full force and effect in Iowa. 21 3. Any negotiated agreement under this section shall be void 22 unless all of the following occur: 23 a. The passage of an Act approving the agreement by the 24 general assembly, signed by the governor. 25 b. The passage of a similar Act relinquishing and waiving 26 to the state of Iowa all claim of jurisdiction over the land by 27 the legislature of Minnesota. 28 c. The passage of an Act of Congress approving the change of 29 jurisdiction. 30 d. The passage of an Act by the general assembly 31 appropriating moneys to pay for the purchase of the land 32 relinquished by the state of Minnesota, if payment is required 33 by the agreement. 34 e. The passage of a constitutional amendment by the state of 35 -1- LSB 1297XS (5) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 354 Iowa ratifying the new boundaries of the state. 1 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 2 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 3